Wyoming, session 2026, HB0078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-1-601 is created to read:
ARTICLE 6
FOREST HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM
36-1-601. Forest health grant program; duties of
state forester; account created; eligible entities;
attorney general approval.
(a) There is created the forest health grant program.
The grant program shall be administered by the state
forester, who shall establish the application process and
any other requirements of the grant program not otherwise
provided by this section.
(b) The state forester may only grant funds to
nonprofit and governmental organizations for the purposes
specified in this section.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of
this section, grants under the forest health grant program
shall pay for not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of
the cost of an eligible forest health project as specified
in this subsection. Any other source of funds, cash or
in-kind contributions may be used as matching funds to
cover the remainder of a project's costs and the state
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0078
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
forester may require that matching funds be obligated to
pay for a portion of any project. Forest health projects
eligible for grant funding under this section shall be
conducted on state, federal government, local government or
private land, shall be necessary in the public interest and
shall be designed to accomplish one (1) or more of the
following:
(i) Enhancement of water yield or quality;
(ii) Reduction of the risk of catastrophic
wildfire damage;
(iii) Increased production of forest products;
(iv) Improvement of habitat conditions for
wildlife and livestock;
(v) Any other project that is beneficial to
forest health, that is substantially beneficial to the
interest of the state and that has a public purpose as
determined by the state forester.
(d) Any grant under the forest health program that is
used on federal land shall not pay for more than fifty
percent (50%) of the cost of an eligible forest health
project as specified under subsection (c) of this section.
Any other source of funds, cash or in-kind contributions
may be used as matching funds to cover the remainder of a
project's costs and the state forester may require that
matching funds be obligated to pay for a portion of any
project. If a forest health project is conducted through
good neighbor authority, receipts collected through
implementation of the project may be used as matching funds
under this subsection.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0078
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) No forest health grant shall be made under this
section without the attorney general's review and approval
of the grant.
(f) There is created the forest health grant program
account. The account shall consist of those funds
designated to the account by law. Funds in the account
shall be used for grants authorized to be made under this
section. Any person may also grant, give, transfer, bequest
or donate funds to the account. Funds in the account shall
be invested as provided by law. Any funds remaining in the
account at the end of any fiscal year shall not lapse or
revert as provided by W.S. 9-4-207 but shall remain in the
account and be used to implement the purposes of this
section. Accrued interest and other earnings on unexpended
funds within the forest health grant program account shall
be credited to the account.
(g) The state forester shall annually report to the
joint agriculture, state and public lands and water
resources interim committee not later than September 1 on
all grants awarded under this section including the amounts
of the grants and the projects the grants were authorized
to fund.
Section 2. There is appropriated three million five
hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000.00) from the general
fund to the forest health grant program account for
purposes of implementing this act and making grants
authorized by this act. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose without
further legislative authorization. Notwithstanding W.S.
9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, this appropriation shall
remain in effect and not lapse or revert at the end of any
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0078
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
fiscal period except upon further legislative action. It is
the intent of the legislature that additional funding for
this purpose be included in the state forester's next
standard budget request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4